New York, session 2025-2026, A703.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3641 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 18 to read as follows: 3 18. School resource officer grant. a. For the two thousand twenty- 4 five--two thousand twenty-six school year and subsequent school years, 5 eligible school districts shall receive grants in aid equal to one 6 hundred percent of the combined annual salaries paid to school resource 7 officers employed at schools in the district. 8 b. For purposes of this section, the term "school resource officer" 9 shall mean a school resource officer, school safety officer, school 10 security officer, school police officer, or any other substantially 11 similar position or office, that is designed to provide improved public 12 safety and/or security on school grounds. Such school resource officer 13 may be a retired police officer, a retired state trooper, a retired 14 deputy sheriff, a state trooper, a police officer in the active duty 15 service of a town, city or village, or a deputy sheriff from a county 16 sheriff's department. 17 § 2. Paragraph h of subdivision 4 of section 1950 of the education law 18 is amended by adding a new subparagraph 14 to read as follows: 19 (14) To enter into contracts with local police entities to provide 20 school resource officers, as such term is defined in subdivision eigh- 21 teen of section thirty-six hundred forty-one of this chapter, provided 22 that the costs of such school resource officers shall be eligible for EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02507-01-5 A. 703 2 1 grants to the same extent and on the same basis as eligible school 2 districts pursuant to subdivision eighteen of section thirty-six hundred 3 forty-one of this chapter. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.